Massachusetts, session 194th, H4456.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. The first paragraph of section 165 of chapter 112 of the General Laws, as
appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out clause (3) and inserting
in place thereof the following clause:- (3) demonstrates to the board, the successful completion
of a masters degree in a relevant field from an educational institution licensed by the state in
which it is located and meets national standards for granting of a masters degree with a
subspecialization in marriage and family therapy, rehabilitation counseling, counseling, or a
relevant subspecialization approved by the board; provided, however, that all relevant graduate
coursework credits, as determined by the board, that an individual earns that count towards the
credit requirement for professional licensure as specialized instructional support personnel,
which is inclusive of school counselors, school social workers, adjustment counselors, and
school psychologists, by the department of elementary and secondary education shall be applied
towards this educational requirement for applicants seeking licensure as a mental health
counselor, including credits earned in a graduate program that is less than 60 credits. To be
eligible for licensure, an applicant must have two additional years of supervised clinical
of 3

experience in the relevant field in either a clinic or hospital licensed by the department of mental
health or accredited by the Joint Commission on Accreditation of Hospitals or in an equivalent
center or institute under the direction of a supervisor approved by the board; provided, that any
applicant seeking licensure as a mental health counselor who applies graduate coursework or
clinical experience as specialized instructional support personnel licensed by the department of
elementary and secondary education shall also demonstrate completion of evidence-based
training in suicide prevention or intervention. Such training may be completed as part of a
graduate program, professional development, or continuing education approved by the board. For
purposes of this clause, “Supervision” shall be defined as no less than 200 hours of supervised
clinical experience, including experience as a specialized instructional support personnel
licensed by the department of elementary and secondary education, at least 100 hours of which
shall consist of individual supervision with a clinician who has expertise in marriage and family
therapy, rehabilitation counseling, educational psychology, social work, or counseling and who
holds a masters degree in social work, marriage and family therapy, rehabilitation counseling,
educational psychology, counseling or an equivalent field or holds a doctorate degree in
psychology, or a medical degree with a subspecialization in psychiatry; provided, however, that
experience as specialized instructional support personnel shall only apply towards the supervised
experience requirement for applicants who are seeking licensure as a mental health counselor;
and provided further, that experience as a school counselor may be supervised by an individual
who holds a masters in school counseling and is duly licensed as a mental health counselor;
SECTION 2. Said section 165 of said chapter 112, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by inserting after the word “section”, in line 30, the following words:- provided,
however, that specialized instructional support personnel, which includes but is not limited to
of 3

school counselors, shall be qualified to sit for the written or oral examination for licensure as a
mental health counselor.
of 3